src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v6 !!≈ * **@CODE@** =  paeta:pake
+V+Inf:^WG%>t^A KK ;
+V+Inf+Tra:^WG%>t^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:^WG%>ten K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:^WG%>tess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:^WG%>t^Aess^A K ; !CHECK
+V+InfMa:ne 3infcase_odd ; 
+V+InfMa+Ill:ne%>m^HMET2h^A^An K ; ! 

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^WG%>t^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^WG%>t^A K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:^WG%>t^U K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>ni4s K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:^WG%>^N^Ut K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:^WG%>^Nhee x3_oblique ; !kyenheet etc
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>hneet K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:n%>ev^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:^WGt%>t^Av^A x3 ;

!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>tt^U K ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Ut K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:%>ne # ;
!+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>t^Akh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:^WG%>kk^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:^WG%>t^A%>kh^O^Ot # ;

+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2:%>ne K ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2:^WG%>kk^O K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:ne%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ne%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:ne%>e K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:ne%>mm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ne%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ne%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ne%>vv^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ne%>e K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:ne%>v^At K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:n%>in K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:n%>it K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:n%>i K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:n%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:n%>itt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:n%>it K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:n%>i3v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:n%>i3v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^WG%>thiin K ;

+V+Act+Cond:%>ni4s 3cond ;
!+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>ni4s%>im^A K ;
!+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>ni4s%>it K ;
!+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>ni4s%>iv^A K ;

+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:^WG%>tt^U K ; !havattu
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:^WG%>^t^Ut K ; !havatut
+V+AgPrc:ne%>m^A K ; 
+V+Der/minen:nemi nen ;


!! ## Subparadigms
!! ### Conditional forms

LEXICON 2cond !!≈ **@CODE@**  for -imm^A
+Sg1:%>in K ; ! 
+Sg2:%>it K ;
+Sg3: K ;
+Pl1:%>imm^A K ;
+Pl1+Err/Orth:%>im^A K ;
+Pl2:%>itt^A K ;
+Pl3:%>iv^A K ;
+Pl3:%>ivv^A K ;
+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>iv^At K ;
+Pl3:%>it K ;

LEXICON 3cond !!≈ **@CODE@**  for -im^A
+Sg1:%>in K ; ! 
+Sg2:%>it K ;
+Sg3: K ;
+Pl1:%>im^A K ;
+Pl1+Err/Orth:%>imm^A K ;
+Pl2:%>itt^A K ;
+Pl3:%>iv^A K ;
+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>iv^At K ;
+Pl3:%>it K ;


!! ### Infinitive paradigms

LEXICON 3infcase
+Ill:%>^HMETAmh^A^An K ; ! 
+Ine:%>m^Ass^A K ;
+Ela:%>m^Ast^A K ;
+Ade:%>m^All^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+Abe:%>m^Att^A K ;

LEXICON 3infcase_odd
+Ill:%>^HMETAmh^A^An K ; ! 
+Ine:%>m^Ass^A K ;
+Ela:%>m^Ast^A K ;
+Ade:%>m^Al^A K ; ! TODO -la / -lla
+Abe:%>m^Att^A K ;


!! from fkv

LEXICON x3_obli 
!+Sg+Nom:       PxK ;
+Pl+Nom:^WG%>t PxK ;

!LEXICON v12pers_long
! +Pl1:%>mm^A K ; !
! v12pers ;

LEXICON v12pers_short
 +Pl1:%>m^A K ;
 v12pers ;

LEXICON v12pers !!≈ @CODE@ Only Sg12, Pl1 so far
 +Sg1:%>n K ;
 +Sg2:%>t K ;
 +Pl2:%>tt^A K ;



LEXICON PRFPRC_OBL !!≈ @CODE@ is without nom sg from fkv


! obl_strong_odd ;
! +Sg:%>i2 com ;
! +Pl:%>i2 com ;
!weak_v_stem ;
+Sg+Par:^U%>tt^A K ;
!:hee x_32_et_ts_common ;
!+Sg+Ill:hee ill_sseen    ;
!+Pl+Gen:hee%>i2 gen_tten ;
+Pl+Com:hee%>i2ne K ;
!!+Err/Orth:ee x_32_et_ts_common ;
!+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ee ill_sseen    ;
!+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:ee%>i2 gen_tten ;
!+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:ee%>i2ne K ;
