src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
paeta:pake v6 ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
laaeta:laae v6 ;
vaieta:vaike v6 ;
tungeta:tunge v6 ;
paheta:pahe v6 ;
vaheta:vahe v6 ;
vanheta:vanhe v6 ;
loheta:lohe v6 ;
roheta:rohe v6 ;
puheta:puhe v6 ;
oieta:oie v6 ;
muieta:muie v6 ;
laajeta:laaje v6 ;
lohjeta:lohje v6 ;
puhjeta:puhje v6 ;
kaijeta:kaije v6 ;
muiijeta:muiije v6 ;
oijeta:oije v6 ;
muijeta:muije v6 ;
haljeta:halje v6 ;
valjeta:valje v6 ;
juljeta:julje v6 ;
karjeta:karje v6 ;
tarjeta:tarje v6 ;
lujeta:luje v6 ;
vaiketa:vaikke v6 ;
nalketa:nalkke v6 ;
laisketa:laiske v6 ;
posketa:poske v6 ;
ratketa:ratke v6 ;
aleta:ale v6 ;
vaaleta:vaale v6 ;
koleta:kole v6 ;
tuuleta:tuule v6 ;
laimeta:laime v6 ;
julmeta:julme v6 ;
tammeta:tamme v6 ;
ummeta:umme v6 ;
tummeta:tumme v6 ;
varmeta:varme v6 ;
lumeta:lume v6 ;
kuumeta:kuume v6 ;
noeta:noe v6 ;
mureta:mure v6 ;
maseta:mase v6 ;
musteta:muste v6 ;
aueta:auke v6 ;
laueta:lauke v6 ;
liueta:liuke v6 ;
poueta:pouke v6 ;
rueta:rupe v6 ;
tueta:tuke v6 ;
klaaveta:klaave v6 ;
laveta:lave v6 ;
loiveta:loive v6 ;
kalveta:kalve v6 ;
kolveta:kolve v6 ;
koveta:kove v6 ;
torveta:torve v6 ;
ruveta:ruve v6 ;
vihetä:vihe v6 ;
vishetä:vishe v6 ;
lyhetä:lyhe v6 ;
löyhetä:löyhe v6 ;
lähetä:lähe v6 ;
vähetä:vähe v6 ;
hietä:hike v6 ; 
liietä:liie v6 ;
pietä:pike v6 ;
kehjetä:kehk4e v6 ;
teljetä:telke v6 ;
iljetä:ilke v6 ;
hiljetä:hilke v6 ;
mäljetä:mälke v6 ;
kihketä:kihkke v6 ;
heiketä:heikke v6 ;
liketä:likke v6 ; ! xxx 
jyrketä:jyrkke v6 ;
väletä:väle v6 ;
pehmetä:pehme v6 ;
pimetä:pime v6 ;
ilmetä:ilme v6 ;
kylmetä:kylme v6 ;
lemmetä:lempe v6 ;
lämmetä:lämpe v6 ;
kiinetä:kiine v6 ;
litetä:lite v6 ;
lievetä:lieve v6 ;
kevetä:keve v6 ;
levetä:leve v6 ;
revetä:repe v6 ;
kiivetä:kiive v6 ;
liivetä:liive v6 ;
kliivetä:kliive v6 ;
pilvetä:pilve v6 ;
tyvetä:tyve v6 ;
kyetä:kyke v6 ;
himmetä:himme v6 ;
